California, session 20252026, AB2091.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 26220 of the Government Code is amended to read:26220. (a) The board of supervisors may, by a four-fifths vote of its members, assign for purposes of collection, under any terms and conditions that the board may prescribe, any or all delinquent bills, claims, and accounts, 30 days after the date upon which they are due and payable to the county, and any or all money judgments taken in the name of the county.(b) The board of supervisors may, by a four-fifths vote of its members, and with the approval of the tax collector, assign for purposes of collection under such terms and conditions as the board may prescribe, any or all delinquent unsecured taxes 90 days after the date upon which they are due and delinquentwhen, in the judgment of the tax collector, the remedy set forth in Section 2951 of the Revenue and Taxation Code will not be used by the tax collector. delinquent.(c) The board of supervisors may assign, for purposes of securing any financing of the same, any obligations arising out of any delinquent assessments or taxes levied on the secured roll by the county or any other political subdivision of the state. No assignment to a collection agency shall be made of obligations arising out of any delinquent assessments or taxes levied on the secured roll by the county or any other political subdivision of the state.